District of Columbia statutes.
42-2902

Rental assistance.

(a)

The Department shall offer public housing units at a discounted rental rate to Metropolitan police officers. In assigning public housing units, the Department shall establish a priority for Metropolitan police officers who already reside in the District.

(b)

Notwithstanding any other provision of District of Columbia law or regulation, Metropolitan police officers who reside in the District of Columbia may receive discounted rent from private or public housing providers.

(c)

All Metropolitan police officers who receive a discounted rent from a private or public housing provider shall notify the Chief of Police of the terms of the discount, and provide a copy of any lease or written agreement detailing the terms of the housing arrangement.

(d)

Any discounted rent received by a Metropolitan police officer shall not be considered income for purposes of District of Columbia income tax.

Feb. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-70, § 3, 40 DCR 7575
1981 Ed., § 45-2232.
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 3 of Metropolitan Police Housing Assistance Program and Community Safety Temporary Act of 1993 (D.C. Law 10-63, October 8, 1993, law notification 40 DCR ]).